Vermont, session 2025-2026, S266.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. DEFINITIONS
Wherever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning
clearly appears from the context As used in this chapter:
* * *
(5) “Wetlands” means those areas of the State that are inundated by
surface or groundwater with a frequency sufficient to support significant
vegetation or aquatic life that depend on saturated or seasonally saturated soil
conditions for growth and reproduction. Such areas include marshes, swamps,
sloughs, potholes, fens, river and lake overflows, mud flats, bogs, and ponds,
but excluding such areas as grow food or crops in connection with farming
activities.
(6) “Class I wetland” means:
(A) a wetland identified on the Vermont significant wetlands
inventory maps as a Class I wetland;
(B) a wetland that the former Water Resources Board identified in
rules of the Board as a Class I wetland; or
(C) a wetland that the Secretary, based upon an evaluation of the
extent to which the wetland serves the functions and values set forth in
subdivision 905b(18)(A) of this title, determines is exceptional or irreplaceable
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 3 of 10
in its contribution to Vermont’s natural heritage and, therefore, merits the
highest level of protection.
(7) “Class II wetland” means a wetland other than a Class I or Class III
wetland that:
(A) is a wetland identified on the Vermont significant wetlands
inventory maps; or
(B) the Secretary determines to merit protection, pursuant to section
914 of this title, based upon an evaluation of the extent to which it serves the
functions and values set forth in subdivision 905b(18)(A) of this title and the
rules of the Department.
(8) “Class III wetland” means a wetland that is neither a Class I wetland
nor a Class II wetland.
(9) “Buffer zone” means an area contiguous to a significant wetland that
protects the wetland’s functions and values. The buffer zone for a Class I
wetland shall extend at least 100 feet from the border of the wetland, unless the
Department determines otherwise under section 915 914 of this title. The
buffer zone for a Class II wetland shall extend at least 50 feet from the border
of the wetland unless the Secretary determines otherwise under section 914 of
this title.
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 4 of 10
(10) “Necessary linear utilities” means the electricity, gas, water, sewer
lateral, access road, driveway, or septic force main that are necessary for the
construction or use of the primary residential function of a housing project.
(11) “Panel” means the Water Resources Panel of the Agency of Natural
Resources.
(12) “Residential housing project” means a single-family, multiunit, or
multifamily housing project, a shelter project, or a mixed-use project that
includes a residential housing component that is at least 75 percent of the total
square footage of the project, not including hotels or vacation rentals. This
term does not include ancillary improvements to existing housing that are not
necessary to the primary residential function, including patios, decks, lawns,
picnic pavilions, recreational facilities, and gardens.
(11)(13) “Significant wetland” means any Class I or Class II wetland.
(12)(14) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or the
Secretary’s authorized representative.
(13)(15) “Dam removal” has the same meaning as in section 1080 of
this title.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 913 is amended to read:
§ 913. PROHIBITION
(a) Except for allowed uses adopted by the Department by rule as set forth
in this section, no person shall conduct or allow to be conducted an activity in
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 5 of 10
a significant wetland or buffer zone of a significant wetland except in
compliance with a permit, conditional use determination, or order issued by the
Secretary.
(b) No permit shall be required for allowed uses adopted by the Department
by rule. The Department may adopt allowed uses for the construction of
residential housing projects and necessary linear utilities related to the housing
projects.
(c) No permit shall be required for the construction of residential housing
projects and necessary linear utilities related to a housing project in an
unmapped Class II wetland or an unmapped Class II wetland buffer.
(d) Except in flood hazard areas and river corridors mapped by the
Department, a wetland permit shall allow construction of residential housing
projects and necessary linear utilities that impact the functions and values set
forth in subdivisions 905b(A)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this title within a Class II
wetland and its buffer, provided that required stormwater permits are obtained
to address the water storage and water quality–related functions.
(e) An applicant for a wetland permit shall not be required to submit a new
wetland delineation if there is an existing delineation accepted by the Secretary
that was completed not more than 10 years before the date of the application.
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 6 of 10
(f) A permit shall not be required under this section for:
(1) any activity that occurred before the effective date of this section
unless the activity occurred within:
(A) an area identified as a wetland on the Vermont significant
wetlands inventory maps;
(B) a wetland that was contiguous to an area identified as a wetland
on the Vermont significant wetlands inventory maps; or
(C) the buffer zone of a wetland referred to in subdivision (A) or (B)
of this subdivision (1); and
(2) any construction within a wetland that is identified on the Vermont
significant wetlands inventory maps or within the buffer zone of such a
wetland, provided that the construction was completed prior to February 23,
1992, and no action for which a permit is required under the rules of the
Department was taken or caused to be taken on or after February 23, 1992.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 914 is amended to read:
§ 914. WETLANDS DETERMINATIONS
(a) The Secretary may, upon a petition or on his or her the Secretary’s own
motion, determine whether any wetland is a Class II or Class III wetland. Such
determinations shall be based on an evaluation of the functions and values set
forth in subdivision 905b(18)(A) of this title and the rules of the Department.
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 7 of 10
(b) The Secretary, at the Secretary’s discretion, may establish the necessary
width of the buffer zone of any Class II wetland as part of any wetland
determination pursuant to the rules of the Department.
(c) The provisions of chapter 170 of this title shall apply to issuance of
determinations under this section.
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) The Secretary may recommend to the panel that a wetland be classified
as a Class I wetland under section 915 of this title. [Repealed.]
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 918 is amended to read:
§ 918. NET GAIN OF WETLANDS; STATE GOAL; RULEMAKING
(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
amend the Vermont Wetlands Rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to clarify
that the goal of wetlands regulation and management in the State is the net gain
of wetlands to be achieved through protection of existing wetlands and
restoration of wetlands that were previously adversely affected. This condition
shall not apply to wetland, river, and flood plain restoration projects, including
dam removals.
(b) The Vermont Wetlands Rules shall prioritize the protection of existing
intact wetlands from adverse effects. Where a permitted activity in a wetland
will cause more than 5,000 square feet of adverse effects that cannot be
avoided, the Secretary shall mandate that the permit applicant restore, enhance,
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 8 of 10
or create wetlands or buffers to compensate for the adverse effects on a
wetland. The amount of wetlands to be restored, enhanced, or created shall be
calculated, at a minimum, by determining the acreage or square footage of
wetlands permanently drained or filled as a result of the permitted activity and
multiplying that acreage or square footage by two, to result in a ratio of 2:1
restoration to wetland loss. Establishment of a buffer zone contiguous to a
wetland shall not substitute for the restoration, enhancement, or creation of
wetlands. Adverse impacts to wetland buffers shall be compensated for based
on the effects of the impact on wetland function.
(c) At a minimum, the Wetlands Rules shall be revised to:
(1) Require an applicant for a wetland permit that authorizes adverse
impacts to more than 5,000 square feet of wetlands to compensate for those
impacts through restoration, enhancement, or creation of wetland resources.
(2) Incorporate the net gain rule into requirements for permits issued
after September 1, 2025.
(3) Establish a set of parameters and restoration ratios applicable to
permittee-designed restored wetland restoration projects, including a minimum
2:1 ratio of restoration to loss to compensate for permanently filled or drained
wetlands. These parameters shall include consideration of the following
factors:
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 9 of 10
(A) the existing level of wetland function at the site prior to
mitigation or restoration of wetlands;
(B) the amount of wetland acreage and wetland function lost as a
result of the project;
(C) how the wetland acreage and functions will be restored at the
proposed compensation site;
(D) the length of time before the compensation site will be fully
functional;
(E) the risk that the compensation project may not succeed;
(F) the differences in the location of the adversely affected wetland
and the wetland subject to compensation that affect the services and values
offered; and
(G) the requirement that permittees conduct five years of post-
restoration monitoring for the restored wetlands, at which time the Agency can
decide if further action is needed.
(d) When amending the Vermont Wetlands Rules under this section, the
Secretary shall establish a Vermont in-lieu fee (ILF) compensation program for
wetlands impacts that may be authorized as compensation for an adverse effect
on a wetland when the permittee cannot achieve restoration. The Secretary
may implement a Vermont ILF compensation program through agreements
with third-party entities such as the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers or
VT LEG #385912 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.266
2026 Page 10 of 10
environmental organizations, provided that any ILF monetary compensation
authorized under the rules shall be expended on restoration, reestablishment,
enhancement, or conservation projects within the State at the HUC 8 level of
the adversely affected wetland when practicable.
(e) The Secretary shall issue comprehensive guidance, with the input of
wetland consultants and other stakeholders, regarding avoidance and
minimization, mitigation sequencing, and alternatives analysis on or before
October 15, 2026. Avoidance and minimization or alternatives analysis shall
not require an applicant to consider properties that are not owned or controlled
by the applicant.
Sec. 5. PENDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS
Pending wetland permit applications for the construction of residential
housing projects and necessary linear utilities related to the housing projects
that were filed prior to the effective date of this act and for which the
Department of Environmental Conservation has not posted a draft permit
decision for public notice and comment shall be processed in accordance with
10 V.S.A. chapter 37 as amended by this act.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385912 v.1